District of Columbia statutes.
16-3707

Default.

If, after notice as provided by section 16-3706 , the defendant fails to appear, the court may proceed as in case of default after personal service.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 605, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3707.
1973 Ed., § 16-3707.